Maine, session 132, LD793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend the law governing gaming revenue allocations by
modernizing cascade allocations and increasing the allocations to the Gambling Addiction
Prevention and Treatment Fund.
Page 1 - 132LR1395(01)